Maryland, session 2026, HB1494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–220.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Demand response program” means a program established by an electric
company, an electricity supplier, or a third party that promotes changes in electric usage
by customers from their normal consumption patterns in response to:
(1) changes in the price of electricity over time; or
(2) incentives designed to:
(i) induce lower electricity use at times of high wholesale market
prices; or
(ii) ensure system reliability.
7–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(F–1) “DEMAND RESPONSE PROGRAM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–220
OF THIS TITLE.
(F–2) “DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–1001 OF THIS TITLE.
(G–1) “ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SUPPORT SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 7–1001 OF THIS TITLE.
(G–2) “EMISSIONS–FREE ENERGY CERTIFICATE” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 7–707 OF THIS TITLE.
7–510.
(d) (1) This subsection applies to residential electricity supply other than
supply offered through:

HOUSE BILL 1494 3
(i) standard offer service;
(ii) the Department of General Services’ sale of energy under §
7–704.4 of this title; [or]
(iii) a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this subtitle;
OR
(IV) A RESIDENTIAL ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER’S SALE OF GREEN
POWER UNDER § 7–707 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) [A] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
residential electricity supplier:
(i) may offer electricity[, other than green power,] only at a price
that does not exceed the trailing 12–month average of the electric company’s standard offer
service rate in the electric company’s service territory as of the date of agreement with the
customer;
(ii) [may offer residential electricity supply only for a term not to
exceed 12 months at a time;
(iii)] may[, for electricity supply other than green power,]
automatically renew the term only if the electricity supplier provides notice to the customer
90 days before and 30 days before renewal;
[(iv) may offer green power that meets the requirements of § 7–707 of
this title, but may not automatically renew the term with the customer;
(v)] (III) subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, may not offer a
variable rate other than a rate that adjusts for seasonal variation not more than twice in a
single year; and
[(vi)] (IV) may not pay a commission or other incentive–based
compensation to an energy salesperson for enrolling customers.
(3) [Paragraph (2)(v) of] NOTHING IN this subsection [does not] SHALL
prohibit the offer and use of:
(I) time–of–use rates:
1. FOR A TERM GREATER THAN 12 MONTHS AT A TIME;
2. that establish different rates for periods within a single

HOUSE BILL 1494
day; OR
3. THAT INCLUDE AN ON–PEAK RATE THAT EXCEEDS THE
TRAILING 12–MONTH AVERAGE OF THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S STANDARD OFFER
SERVICE RATE AS OF THE DATE OF AGREEMENT WITH THE CUSTOMER;
(II) PRODUCTS THAT COMBINE ELECTRICITY SUPPLY WITH
EMISSIONS–FREE ENERGY CERTIFICATES, INCLUDING THOSE:
1. THAT ARE PART OF A CONTRACT FOR A TERM
GREATER THAN 12 MONTHS AT A TIME;
2. OFFERED AT A PRICE PER KILOWATT–HOUR FOR THE
ELECTRICITY SUPPLY AND CERTIFICATES THAT, WHEN COMBINED, EXCEEDS THE
TRAILING 12–MONTH AVERAGE OF THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S STANDARD OFFER
SERVICE RATE AS OF THE DATE OF AGREEMENT WITH THE CUSTOMER; OR
3. OFFERED AT A VARIABLE RATE THAT MAY ADJUST
MONTHLY; OR
(III) PRODUCTS THAT COMBINE ELECTRICITY SUPPLY WITH ONE
OR MORE DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES THAT PROVIDE ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SUPPORT SERVICES, INCLUDING THOSE:
1. THAT ARE PART OF A CONTRACT FOR A TERM
GREATER THAN 12 MONTHS AT A TIME;
2. OFFERED AT A PRICE PER KILOWATT–HOUR, FOR THE
PRODUCT ONLY, THAT EXCEEDS THE TRAILING 12–MONTH AVERAGE OF THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY’S STANDARD OFFER SERVICE RATE AS OF THE DATE OF
AGREEMENT WITH THE CUSTOMER; OR
3. OFFERED AT A VARIABLE RATE THAT MAY ADJUST
MONTHLY.
(4) (I) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A residential electricity supplier may not sell to an electric company, and an
electric company may not purchase from the electricity supplier, accounts receivable.
(II) A RESIDENTIAL ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER MAY SELL TO AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY, AND AN ELECTRIC COMPANY MAY PURCHASE FROM THE
ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER, ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE FOR THE PRODUCTS SPECIFIED IN
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1494 5
(J) NOTWITHSTANDING THE DEFINITION OF “ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM SUPPORT SERVICES” IN § 7–1001 OF THIS TITLE, A DISTRIBUTED ENERGY
RESOURCE AGGREGATOR THAT IS PROVIDING ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM
SUPPORT SERVICES AND IS PARTICIPATING IN A DEMAND RESPONSE PROGRAM MAY
NOT BE LIMITED TO ACTING AT THE DIRECTION OF AN ELECTRIC COMPANY.
(K) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS THAT:
(1) REQUIRE ELECTRIC COMPANIES TO IMPLEMENT AND USE
CONSOLIDATED BILLING:
(I) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027; AND
(II) THAT INCLUDES PROTOCOLS FOR THE PURCHASE OF
ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE FOR PRODUCTS THAT COMBINE ELECTRICITY WITH
DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES THAT PROVIDE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION
SUPPORT SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D)(3)(III) OF THIS
SECTION;
(2) ESTABLISH CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS AND INFORMATION
EXCHANGE PROTOCOLS NECESSARY TO ENABLE ELECTRICITY SUPPLIERS AND
DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE AGGREGATORS TO PROVIDE PRODUCTS THAT
COMBINE ELECTRICITY WITH ONE OR MORE DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES
THAT PROVIDE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SUPPORT SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (D)(3)(III) OF THIS SECTION;
(3) REQUIRE ELECTRIC COMPANIES TO IMPLEMENT AND MAINTAIN
NONDISCRIMINATORY AND EXPEDITED PROCEDURES FOR THE INTERCONNECTION
OF DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES TO FACILITATE PRODUCTS THAT COMBINE
ELECTRICITY WITH ONE OR MORE DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES THAT
PROVIDE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SUPPORT SERVICES WITHOUT GIVING ANY
PREFERENCE TO DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES PARTICIPATING IN ANY PILOT
PROGRAM OR TARIFF UNDER SUBTITLE 10 OF THIS TITLE OR ANY OTHER
SUCCESSOR PROGRAMS OR TARIFFS; AND
(4) IMPLEMENT ANY OTHER CHANGES THAT THE COMMISSION
DETERMINES NECESSARY TO ENABLE A COMPETITIVE MARKET FOR PRODUCTS
THAT COMBINE ELECTRICITY WITH ONE OR MORE DISTRIBUTED ENERGY
RESOURCES THAT PROVIDE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SUPPORT SERVICES.
7–604.2.
(a) (1) In this section[, “default] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE

HOUSE BILL 1494
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “DEFAULT gas commodity service” means the supply of retail gas
commodity service by a customer’s gas company.
(3) “EMISSIONS–REDUCING PRODUCT OR SERVICE” INCLUDES
PRODUCTS AND SERVICES SUPPORTING:
(I) ENERGY EFFICIENCY, INCLUDING MAINTENANCE AND
REPAIR;
(II) ANALYTICS–BASED EFFICIENCY MONITORING; AND
(III) OTHER ENERGY CONSUMPTION REDUCTION PRODUCTS.
(b) (1) This subsection applies to residential gas supply other than default gas
commodity service provided by a gas company.
(2) [A] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A gas
supplier that supplies gas to residential retail gas customers:
(i) may offer gas service only at a price that does not exceed the
trailing 12–month average of the gas company’s default gas commodity service in the gas
company’s service territory as of the date of the agreement with the customer;
(ii) [may offer residential gas supply only for a term not to exceed 12
months at a time and] may automatically renew [the] A term only if the gas supplier
provides notice to the customer 90 days before and 30 days before renewal;
(iii) [subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection,] may not offer a
variable rate other than a rate that adjusts for seasonal variation not more than twice in a
single year; and
(iv) may not pay a commission or other incentive–based
compensation to an energy salesperson for enrolling customers.
(3) [Paragraph (2)(iii) of] NOTHING IN this subsection [does not] SHALL
prohibit the offer and use of:
(I) rates that differ based on the total number of therms used by a
customer in any billing period, INCLUDING THOSE:
1. THAT ARE PART OF A CONTRACT FOR A TERM
GREATER THAN 12 MONTHS AT A TIME; OR

HOUSE BILL 1494 7
2. THAT INCLUDE A THRESHOLD NUMBER OF THERMS
USED BY THE CUSTOMER, BEYOND WHICH THE PRICE MAY EXCEED THE TRAILING
12–MONTH AVERAGE OF THE GAS COMPANY’S DEFAULT GAS COMMODITY SERVICE
IN THE GAS COMPANY’S SERVICE TERRITORY AS OF THE DATE OF THE AGREEMENT
WITH THE CUSTOMER; OR
(II) PRODUCTS THAT COMBINE NATURAL GAS WITH AN
EMISSIONS–REDUCING PRODUCT OR SERVICE, INCLUDING THOSE:
1. THAT ARE PART OF A CONTRACT FOR A TERM
GREATER THAN 12 MONTHS AT A TIME; OR
2. OFFERED AT A PRICE PER THERM THAT EXCEEDS THE
TRAILING 12–MONTH AVERAGE OF THE GAS COMPANY’S DEFAULT GAS COMMODITY
SERVICE IN THE GAS COMPANY’S SERVICE TERRITORY AS OF THE DATE OF THE
AGREEMENT WITH THE CUSTOMER.
(4) (I) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, A gas supplier that supplies gas to residential retail gas customers may
not sell to a gas company, and a gas company may not purchase from the gas supplier,
accounts receivable.
(II) A GAS SUPPLIER MAY SELL TO A GAS COMPANY, AND A GAS
COMPANY MAY PURCHASE FROM THE GAS SUPPLIER, ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE FOR
PRODUCTS UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
7–707.
(a) (1) In this section[, “green power”] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “EMISSIONS–FREE ENERGY” MEANS ELECTRIC POWER OUTPUT
FROM A GENERATING FACILITY THAT DOES NOT DIRECTLY PRODUCE ANY
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS.
(3) “EMISSIONS–FREE ENERGY CERTIFICATE” MEANS A CERTIFICATE
OBTAINED THROUGH THE PJM ENVIRONMENTAL INFORMATION SERVICES, INC.,
GENERATION ATTRIBUTE TRACKING SYSTEM FROM A GENERATING FACILITY THAT
PRODUCES EMISSIONS–FREE ENERGY.
(4) “EMISSIONS–REDUCING PRODUCT OR SERVICE” INCLUDES
PRODUCTS AND SERVICES SUPPORTING:
(I) HOME ELECTRIFICATION;

HOUSE BILL 1494
(II) ENERGY EFFICIENCY, INCLUDING MAINTENANCE AND
REPAIR;
(III) ANALYTICS–BASED EFFICIENCY MONITORING; AND
(IV) OTHER ENERGY CONSUMPTION REDUCTION PRODUCTS.
(5) “GREEN POWER” means energy sources or renewable energy credits
that are marketed as clean, green, eco–friendly, environmentally friendly or responsible,
carbon–free, renewable, 100% renewable, 100% wind, 100% hydro, 100% solar, 100%
emission–free, or similar claims.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) the Department of General Services when the Department of General
Services sells energy under § 7–704.4 of this subtitle;
(2) a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this title; [or]
(3) an electricity supplier when supplying electricity to commercial retail
electric customers; OR
(4) GREEN POWER PRODUCTS:
(I) WITH TIME–OF–USE RATES THAT ESTABLISH DIFFERENT
RATES FOR PERIODS WITHIN A SINGLE DAY;
(II) COMBINED WITH EMISSIONS–FREE ENERGY CERTIFICATES;
OR
(III) THAT COMBINE ELECTRICITY WITH AN
EMISSIONS–REDUCING PRODUCT OR SERVICE.
7–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Distributed energy resource” means an energy resource located on a
customer’s premises that:
(1) produces or stores electricity; or
(2) modifies the timing or amount of the customer’s electricity
consumption.

HOUSE BILL 1494 9
(e) (1) “Electric distribution system support services” means the dispatch and
control of a distributed energy resource to provide services that contribute to the efficient
and reliable operation of the electric distribution system by:
(i) an electric company; or
(ii) an aggregator acting at the direction of an electric company.
(2) “Electric distribution system support services” includes:
(i) local or system peak demand reduction;
(ii) demand response;
(iii) the avoidance or deferral of a transmission or distribution
upgrade or capacity expansion; and
(iv) facilitating hosting capacity to accommodate additional
distributed energy resources.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.